Nebraska statutes.
Section 1.Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 201477-1001
Act, how cited.

Sections 77-1001 to 77-1035
shall be known and may be cited as the Nebraska Advantage Transformational
Tourism and Redevelopment Act.

Laws 2010, LB1018, § 1.